Utah statutes.
63B-1b-701.   Payment of expenses.

(1)  All expenses incurred by the state under this chapter may be paid:

(a)  in the case of expenses incurred under Section 63B-1b-302, from the proceeds of the liquidation of agency bonds; and

(b)  in the case of expenses incurred under Section 63B-1b-402, from the proceeds of sale of revenue bonds.

(2) (a)  Any expenses incurred by the state under this chapter that are not paid from the proceeds of the liquidation of agency bonds or the issuance of state revenue bonds shall be paid from the revolving funds of the authorizing agencies.

(b)  These expenses are not a charge to or an appropriation from the General Fund.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

